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DTC C 1232 / 32 Deceleration Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1232 /32

Detectionofeitherofconditions 1.and2.:
1.At thevehiclespeedof 10km/h (6mph)ormore,when

thecondition thatECUterminalGL 1 signalchange
range is less than 20 mV, and ECU terminal GL2 signal
change range swings by 468 mV or more occurs for 30
sec.ormore.

2.At thevehiclespeedof 10km/h (6mph)ormore,when
the condition that ECU terminal GL2 signal change
range is less than20mV,andECUterminalGL 1 signal
change range swings by 468 mV or more occurs for 30
sec. or more.

SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the deceleration sensor circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC controls.
INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep 1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueof thedecelerationsensor.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that thedecelerationvalueof thedecelerationsensordisplayedon thehand −held tester ischanging
when tilting the vehicle.
OK:

Deceleration value must be changing.

OK Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
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2 Check deceleration sensor (See page DI−4) .

NG Replace deceleration sensor.

OK

3 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & BA & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


